Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB732.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 103 of the act of April 17, 2016 (P.L.84, No.16), known as the Medical Marijuana Act, is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Essential functions." The fundamental, not marginal, duties of a position.* * *"Impaired." As follows:(1) Symptoms of being under the influence of marijuana that may decrease or lessen an employee's performance of essential duties or tasks that an employer, in good faith, believes will result in carelessness, negligence or disregard for the safety of themselves or others and disrupt business operations.(2) Observable symptoms of impairment from medical marijuana may include the employee's speech, mobility, physical dexterity, agility, coordination, demeanor, appearance, odor or irrational or unusual behavior.* * *"Safety-sensitive position." A position that requires any activity that an employer reasonably believes presents a potential risk of harm to the health or safety of an employee or others, including:(1) Duties performed at heights or in confined spaces, to which the following shall apply:(i) The term "at heights" shall mean an activity undertaken in any place where, if there were no safety precautions in place, a person could fall a certain distance, resulting in personal injury.(ii) The term "confined space" shall mean a space with limited openings for entry or exit that is large enough for entering and working and that is not designed 20250SB0732PN0784 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for continuous worker occupancy, including mines, underground vaults, tanks, storage bins, manholes, pits, silos, underground vaults and pipelines.(2) The operation of any motor vehicle or other vehicle, including a forklift.(3) Operating, repairing, maintaining or monitoring the performance or operation of any equipment, machinery, power tools or manufacturing process, the malfunction or disruption of which could result in injury or property damage.(4) The performance of official firefighting or rescue duties.(5) The operation, maintenance or oversight of critical services and infrastructure, including electric, gas and water utilities, power generation or distribution.(6) The extraction, compression, processing, manufacturing, handling, packaging, storage, disposal, treatment or transport of chemicals or other potentially volatile, flammable, combustible materials, elements, chemicals or other highly regulated component.(7) Dispensing or handling pharmaceuticals.(8) Carrying a firearm or any device or weapon designed or primarily employed so as to incapacitate an individual while minimizing fatalities, permanent injury or undesired damage to property or the environment.(9) Direct patient, elder or child care.* * *"Under the influence." One or more of the following:(1) A drug test pursuant to which it is determined that:(i) the level of tetrahydrocannabinolic acid in the individual's urine is equal to or greater than 15 20250SB0732PN0784 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 nanograms per milliliter; or(ii) the individual has provided an adulterated or substituted testing sample.(2) An employer's good faith determination that an employee or job applicant is under the influence of marijuana based on observable physical behavior or characteristics, provided that an employee may rebut the determination by immediately submitting to a drug test, the results of which demonstrate that the level of tetrahydrocannabinolic acid in the employee's urine is less than 15 nanograms per milliliter.Section 2. Sections 510 and 2103(b) of the act are amended to read:Section 510. Prohibitions.The following prohibitions shall apply:(1) A patient may not operate or be in physical control of any of the following while under the influence with a blood content of more than 10 nanograms of active tetrahydrocannabis per milliliter of blood in serum:(i) Chemicals which require a permit issued by the Federal Government or a state government or an agency of the Federal Government or a state government.(ii) High-voltage electricity or any other public utility.[(2) A patient may not perform any employment duties at heights or in confined spaces, including, but not limited to, mining while under the influence of medical marijuana.(3) A patient may be prohibited by an employer from performing any task which the employer deems life-threatening, to either the employee or any of the employees 20250SB0732PN0784 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the employer, while under the influence of medical marijuana. The prohibition shall not be deemed an adverse employment decision even if the prohibition results in financial harm for the patient.(4) A patient may be prohibited by an employer from performing any duty which could result in a public health or safety risk while under the influence of medical marijuana. The prohibition shall not be deemed an adverse employment decision even if the prohibition results in financial harm for the patient.]Section 2103. Protections for patients and caregivers.* * *(b) Employment.--(1) No employer may discharge, threaten, refuse to hire or otherwise discriminate or retaliate against an employee regarding an employee's compensation, terms, conditions, location or privileges solely on the basis of such employee's status as an individual who is certified to use medical marijuana.(2) Nothing in this act shall require an employer to make any accommodation of the use of medical marijuana on the property or premises of any place of employment. [This act shall in no way limit an employer's ability to discipline an employee for being under the influence of medical marijuana in the workplace or for working while under the influence of medical marijuana when the employee's conduct falls below the standard of care normally accepted for that position.](3) Nothing in this act shall require an employer to commit or refuse to commit any act that would put the employer or any person acting on its behalf in violation of 20250SB0732PN0784 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Federal law.(4) An employer may require employees or job applicants who have received a conditional offer of employment to submit to a drug test, including a test for marijuana, for safety-sensitive positions. An employer may make an adverse employment decision against an employee or job applicant who has provided an adulterated or substituted testing sample or has refused to submit to a lawful drug test required by an employer.(5) An employer or entity that provides employment services or information may indicate that a job position is safety sensitive and the job position's application process or the job may require a drug test.(6) An employer may require an employee or job applicant who has received a conditional employment offer to disclose and produce a valid identification card if the employee's position, or the position for which the job applicant is applying, is a safety-sensitive position. An employer may make an adverse employment decision against an employee or job applicant who fails to disclose and produce a valid identification card under this act, and the employer shall not be in violation of paragraph (1).(7) An employer may make an adverse employment decision against an employee or job applicant who discloses and produces a valid identification card or who uses medical marijuana if the employee's position, or the position for which the job applicant is applying, is a safety-sensitive position, and the employer shall not be in violation of paragraph (1), if the employer has engaged in an interactive process with the employee or applicant to evaluate the 20250SB0732PN0784 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 individual's ability to perform the essential functions of the position with or without reasonable accommodation.(8) An employer may make an adverse employment decision against an employee if the employee's use of medical marijuana decreases or lessens the employee's job performance or ability to perform the employee's job duties, and the employer shall not be in violation of paragraph (1), provided that the employer has engaged in an interactive process with the employee or applicant to evaluate the individual's ability to perform the essential functions of the position with or without reasonable accommodation.(9) Nothing in this section shall be construed to invalidate or void any rights, benefits or procedures afforded to an employee under an existing collective bargaining agreement.(10) Nothing in this section shall be construed to create or permit a cause of action for an employee or job applicant against an employer for:(i) A ny claim that arises following an employee's or job applicant's noncompliance with this section and which the employee or job applicant may have prevented the claim had they complied.(ii) Actions taken pursuant to an employer's lawful workplace drug policy, including subjecting an employee or job applicant to a lawful drug and alcohol test, lawful and nondiscriminatory random drug test and discipline, termination of employment or withdrawal of a job offer after a failure of a drug test.(iii) Actions based on the employer's good faith belief that an employee used or possessed medical 20250SB0732PN0784 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 marijuana in the employer's workplace or while performing the employee's job duties or while on call in violation of the employer's lawful employment policies.(iv) Actions based on the employer's good faith belief that an employee was impaired as a result of the use of medical marijuana, under the influence of medical marijuana while at the employer's workplace, under the influence while performing the employee's job duties or under the influence while on call in violation of the employer's lawful workplace drug policy.(11) If an employer makes an adverse employment decision against an employee or job applicant under this act, the employee or job applicant may not challenge the adverse employment decision under any other State or local law.* * *Section 3. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 2109.1. Enforcement and civil actions.(a) Regulations.--The Secretary of Labor and Industry shall promulgate regulations necessary to enforce section 2103(b).(b) Civil action.--A complainant may only bring a civil action after all administrative remedies are exhausted.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0732PN0784 - 8 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122